Hawaii, session 2025, GM1155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
SECTION 1. The purpose of this Act is to extend the
deadline for the pre-payment and reporting of employer
contributions by departments or agencies of the State or
counties that failed to provide the information required by the
employees' retirement system in the required format.
SECTION 2. Section 88-103.7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (c) to read:
"(c) If a department or agency of the State or county
fails to furnish the system with the information required
pursuant to this section in the format required by the system,
the State or county shall pay to the system, on the first day of
the fiscal year that is one year after the end of
the fiscal year in which the failure to furnish the required
information occurred, an amount equal to the employer
contributions payable by the State or county, relative to the
2025-3031 SB1361 HD2 HMSO 1
IIIIIIIIIIIIIIMIIIIIIIII

Page 2 S.B. NO. 1361
H.D.2
department or agency that is not in compliance with this
section, during the fiscal year in which the failure to furnish
the required information occurred. This amount shall be applied
to contributions required under section 88-124 for the State and
section 88-126 for the counties."
2. By amending subsection (f) to read:
"(f) The system shall annually submit to the department of
budget and finance and the legislature, not later than twenty
days prior to the convening of each regular session, a report
that details the following for the [current] previous fiscal
year:
(1) Any department or agency of the state or counties that
failed to comply with this section; and
(2) Any amounts required to be paid under subsection (c),
including the anticipated amounts payable in the
upcoming fiscal year, and identification of any state
budget programs that may be affected."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3031 SB1361 HD2 HMSO 2
■liiiiniiiHiiimi

S.B. NO. 1361
H.D. 2
APPROVED this 15th dayot May ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B.No. 1361, H.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 16, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
President of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 1361, HD 2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE
STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 8, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives